Luganda.aff
FLAG long
PFX FE l kyebitand l.[^mn]
PFX FE l kyebitann l.[mn]
PFX FE w kyebitamp [w]
PFX FE 0 kyebitamu .
PFX FE 0 kyebitaba .
PFX FE 0 kyebitagu .
PFX FE 0 kyebitagi .
PFX FE 0 kyebitazi .
PFX FE 0 kyebitaki .
PFX FE 0 kyebitabi .
PFX FE 0 kyebitali .
PFX FE 0 kyebitaga .
PFX FE 0 kyebitaka .
PFX FE 0 kyebitabu .
PFX FE 0 kyebitalu .
PFX FE 0 kyebitaku .
PFX FE 0 kyebitatu .
PFX FE 0 kyelitan [^lmnb]
PFX FE l kyelitand l.[^mn]
PFX FE l kyelitann l.[mn]
PFX FE w kyelitamp [w]
PFX FE 0 kyelitamu .
PFX FE 0 kyelitaba .
PFX FE 0 kyelitagu .
PFX FE 0 kyelitagi .
PFX FE 0 kyelitazi .
PFX FE 0 kyelitaki .
PFX FE 0 kyelitabi .
PFX FE 0 kyelitali .
PFX FE 0 kyelitaga .
PFX FE 0 kyelitaka .
PFX FE 0 kyelitabu .
PFX FE 0 kyelitalu .
PFX FE 0 kyelitaku .
PFX FE 0 kyelitatu .
PFX FE 0 kyegatan [^lmnb]
PFX FE l kyegatand l.[^mn]
PFX FE l kyegatann l.[mn]
PFX FE w kyegatamp [w]
PFX FE 0 kyegatamu .
PFX FE 0 kyegataba .
PFX FE 0 kyegatagu .
PFX FE 0 kyegatagi .
PFX FE 0 kyegatazi .
PFX FE 0 kyegataki .
PFX FE 0 kyegatabi .
PFX FE 0 kyegatali .
PFX FE 0 kyegataga .
PFX FE 0 kyegataka .
PFX FE 0 kyegatabu .
PFX FE 0 kyegatalu .
PFX FE 0 kyegataku .
PFX FE 0 kyegatatu .
PFX FE 0 kyekatan [^lmnb]
PFX FE l kyekatand l.[^mn]
PFX FE l kyekatann l.[mn]
PFX FE w kyekatamp [w]
PFX FE 0 kyekatamu .
PFX FE 0 kyekataba .
PFX FE 0 kyekatagu .
PFX FE 0 kyekatagi .
PFX FE 0 kyekatazi .
PFX FE 0 kyekataki .
PFX FE 0 kyekatabi .
PFX FE 0 kyekatali .
PFX FE 0 kyekataga .
PFX FE 0 kyekataka .
PFX FE 0 kyekatabu .
PFX FE 0 kyekatalu .
PFX FE 0 kyekataku .
PFX FE 0 kyekatatu .
PFX FE 0 kyebutan [^lmnb]
PFX FE l kyebutand l.[^mn]
PFX FE l kyebutann l.[mn]
PFX FE w kyebutamp [w]
PFX FE 0 kyebutamu .
PFX FE 0 kyebutaba .
PFX FE 0 kyebutagu .
PFX FE 0 kyebutagi .
PFX FE 0 kyebutazi .
PFX FE 0 kyebutaki .
PFX FE 0 kyebutabi .
PFX FE 0 kyebutali .
PFX FE 0 kyebutaga .
PFX FE 0 kyebutaka .
PFX FE 0 kyebutabu .
PFX FE 0 kyebutalu .
PFX FE 0 kyebutaku .
PFX FE 0 kyebutatu .
PFX FE 0 kyelutan [^lmnb]
PFX FE l kyelutand l.[^mn]
PFX FE l kyelutann l.[mn]
PFX FE w kyelutamp [w]
PFX FE 0 kyelutamu .
PFX FE 0 kyelutaba .
PFX FE 0 kyelutagu .
PFX FE 0 kyelutagi .
PFX FE 0 kyelutazi .
PFX FE 0 kyelutaki .
PFX FE 0 kyelutabi .
PFX FE 0 kyelutali .
PFX FE 0 kyelutaga .
PFX FE 0 kyelutaka .
PFX FE 0 kyelutabu .
PFX FE 0 kyelutalu .
PFX FE 0 kyelutaku .
PFX FE 0 kyelutatu .
PFX FE 0 kyekutan [^lmnb]
PFX FE l kyekutand l.[^mn]
PFX FE l kyekutann l.[mn]
PFX FE w kyekutamp [w]
PFX FE 0 kyekutamu .
PFX FE 0 kyekutaba .
PFX FE 0 kyekutagu .
PFX FE 0 kyekutagi .
PFX FE 0 kyekutazi .
PFX FE 0 kyekutaki .
PFX FE 0 kyekutabi .
PFX FE 0 kyekutali .
PFX FE 0 kyekutaga .
PFX FE 0 kyekutaka .
PFX FE 0 kyekutabu .
PFX FE 0 kyekutalu .
PFX FE 0 kyekutaku .
PFX FE 0 kyekutatu .
PFX FE 0 kyetutan [^lmnb]
PFX FE l kyetutand l.[^mn]
PFX FE l kyetutann l.[mn]
PFX FE w kyetutamp [w]
PFX FE 0 kyetutamu .
PFX FE 0 kyetutaba .
PFX FE 0 kyetutagu .
PFX FE 0 kyetutagi .
PFX FE 0 kyetutazi .
PFX FE 0 kyetutaki .
PFX FE 0 kyetutabi .
PFX FE 0 kyetutali .
PFX FE 0 kyetutaga .
PFX FE 0 kyetutaka .
PFX FE 0 kyetutabu .
PFX FE 0 kyetutalu .
PFX FE 0 kyetutaku .
PFX FE 0 kyetutatu .
PFX FE 0 byessiba .
PFX FE 0 byessigu .
PFX FE 0 byessigi .
PFX FE 0 byessizi .
PFX FE 0 byessiki .
PFX FE 0 byessibi .
PFX FE 0 byessili .
PFX FE 0 byessiga .
PFX FE 0 byessika .
PFX FE 0 byessibu .
PFX FE 0 byessilu .
PFX FE 0 byessiku .
PFX FE 0 byessitu .
PFX FE 0 byessimu .
PFX FE 0 byetutan [^lmnb]
PFX FE l byetutand l.[^mn]
PFX FE l byetutann l.[mn]
PFX FE w byetutamp [w]
PFX FE 0 byetutamu .
PFX FE 0 byetutaba .
PFX FE 0 byetutagu .
PFX FE 0 byetutagi .
PFX FE 0 byetutazi .
PFX FE 0 byetutaki .
PFX FE 0 byetutabi .
PFX FE 0 byetutali .
PFX FE 0 byetutaga .
PFX FE 0 byetutaka .
PFX FE 0 byetutabu .
PFX FE 0 byetutalu .
PFX FE 0 byetutaku .
PFX FE 0 byetutatu .
PFX FE 0 byemutan [^lmnb]
PFX FE l byemutand l.[^mn]
PFX FE l byemutann l.[mn]
PFX FE w byemutamp [w]
PFX FE 0 byemutamu .
PFX FE 0 byemutaba .
PFX FE 0 byemutagu .
PFX FE 0 byemutagi .
PFX FE 0 byemutazi .
PFX FE 0 byemutaki .
PFX FE 0 byemutabi .
PFX FE 0 byemutali .
PFX FE 0 byemutaga .
PFX FE 0 byemutaka .
PFX FE 0 byemutabu .
PFX FE 0 byemutalu .
PFX FE 0 byemutaku .
PFX FE 0 byemutatu .
PFX FE 0 byebatan [^lmnb]
PFX FE l byebatand l.[^mn]
PFX FE l byebatann l.[mn]
PFX FE w byebatamp [w]
PFX FE 0 byebatamu .
PFX FE 0 byebataba .
PFX FE 0 byebatagu .
PFX FE 0 byebatagi .
PFX FE 0 byebatazi .
PFX FE 0 byebataki .
PFX FE 0 byebatabi .
PFX FE 0 byebatali .
PFX FE 0 byebataga .
PFX FE 0 byebataka .
PFX FE 0 byebatabu .
PFX FE 0 byebatalu .
PFX FE 0 byebataku .
PFX FE 0 byebatatu .
PFX FE 0 byegutan [^lmnb]
PFX FE l byegutand l.[^mn]
PFX FE l byegutann l.[mn]
PFX FE w byegutamp [w]
PFX FE 0 byegutamu .
PFX FE 0 byegutaba .
PFX FE 0 byegutagu .
PFX FE 0 byegutagi .
PFX FE 0 byegutazi .
PFX FE 0 byegutaki .
PFX FE 0 byegutabi .
PFX FE 0 byegutali .
PFX FE 0 byegutaga .
PFX FE 0 byegutaka .
PFX FE 0 byegutabu .
PFX FE 0 byegutalu .
PFX FE 0 byegutaku .
PFX FE 0 byegutatu .
PFX FE 0 byegitan [^lmnb]
PFX FE l byegitand l.[^mn]
PFX FE l byegitann l.[mn]
PFX FE w byegitamp [w]
PFX FE 0 byegitamu .
PFX FE 0 byegitaba .
PFX FE 0 byegitagu .
PFX FE 0 byegitagi .
PFX FE 0 byegitazi .
PFX FE 0 byegitaki .
PFX FE 0 byegitabi .
PFX FE 0 byegitali .
PFX FE 0 byegitaga .
PFX FE 0 byegitaka .
PFX FE 0 byegitabu .
PFX FE 0 byegitalu .
PFX FE 0 byegitaku .
PFX FE 0 byegitatu .
PFX FE 0 byezitan [^lmnb]
PFX FE l byezitand l.[^mn]
PFX FE l byezitann l.[mn]
PFX FE w byezitamp [w]
PFX FE 0 byezitamu .
PFX FE 0 byezitaba .
PFX FE 0 byezitagu .
PFX FE 0 byezitagi .
PFX FE 0 byezitazi .
PFX FE 0 byezitaki .
PFX FE 0 byezitabi .
PFX FE 0 byezitali .
PFX FE 0 byezitaga .
PFX FE 0 byezitaka .
PFX FE 0 byezitabu .
PFX FE 0 byezitalu .
PFX FE 0 byezitaku .
PFX FE 0 byezitatu .
PFX FE 0 byekitan [^lmnb]
PFX FE l byekitand l.[^mn]
PFX FE l byekitann l.[mn]
PFX FE w byekitamp [w]
PFX FE 0 byekitamu .
PFX FE 0 byekitaba .
PFX FE 0 byekitagu .
PFX FE 0 byekitagi .
PFX FE 0 byekitazi .
PFX FE 0 byekitaki .
PFX FE 0 byekitabi .
PFX FE 0 byekitali .
PFX FE 0 byekitaga .
PFX FE 0 byekitaka .
PFX FE 0 byekitabu .
PFX FE 0 byekitalu .
PFX FE 0 byekitaku .
PFX FE 0 byekitatu .
PFX FE 0 byebitan [^lmnb]
PFX FE l byebitand l.[^mn]
PFX FE l byebitann l.[mn]
PFX FE w byebitamp [w]
PFX FE 0 byebitamu .
PFX FE 0 byebitaba .
PFX FE 0 byebitagu .
PFX FE 0 byebitagi .
PFX FE 0 byebitazi .
PFX FE 0 byebitaki .
PFX FE 0 byebitabi .
PFX FE 0 byebitali .
PFX FE 0 byebitaga .
PFX FE 0 byebitaka .
PFX FE 0 byebitabu .
PFX FE 0 byebitalu .
PFX FE 0 byebitaku .
PFX FE 0 byebitatu .
PFX FE 0 byelitan [^lmnb]
PFX FE l byelitand l.[^mn]
PFX FE l byelitann l.[mn]
PFX FE w byelitamp [w]
PFX FE 0 byelitamu .
PFX FE 0 byelitaba .
PFX FE 0 byelitagu .
PFX FE 0 byelitagi .
PFX FE 0 byelitazi .
PFX FE 0 byelitaki .
PFX FE 0 byelitabi .
PFX FE 0 byelitali .
PFX FE 0 byelitaga .
PFX FE 0 byelitaka .
PFX FE 0 byelitabu .
PFX FE 0 byelitalu .
PFX FE 0 byelitaku .
PFX FE 0 byelitatu .
PFX FE 0 byegatan [^lmnb]
PFX FE l byegatand l.[^mn]
PFX FE l byegatann l.[mn]
PFX FE w byegatamp [w]
PFX FE 0 byegatamu .
PFX FE 0 byegataba .
PFX FE 0 byegatagu .
PFX FE 0 byegatagi .
PFX FE 0 byegatazi .
PFX FE 0 byegataki .
PFX FE 0 byegatabi .
PFX FE 0 byegatali .
PFX FE 0 byegataga .
PFX FE 0 byegataka .
PFX FE 0 byegatabu .
PFX FE 0 byegatalu .
PFX FE 0 byegataku .
PFX FE 0 byegatatu .
PFX FE 0 byekatan [^lmnb]
PFX FE l byekatand l.[^mn]
PFX FE l byekatann l.[mn]
PFX FE w byekatamp [w]
PFX FE 0 byekatamu .
PFX FE 0 byekataba .
PFX FE 0 byekatagu .
PFX FE 0 byekatagi .
PFX FE 0 byekatazi .
PFX FE 0 byekataki .
PFX FE 0 byekatabi .
PFX FE 0 byekatali .
PFX FE 0 byekataga .
PFX FE 0 byekataka .
PFX FE 0 byekatabu .
PFX FE 0 byekatalu .
PFX FE 0 byekataku .
PFX FE 0 byekatatu .
PFX FE 0 byebutan [^lmnb]
PFX FE l byebutand l.[^mn]
PFX FE l byebutann l.[mn]
PFX FE w byebutamp [w]
PFX FE 0 byebutamu .
PFX FE 0 byebutaba .
PFX FE 0 byebutagu .
PFX FE 0 byebutagi .
PFX FE 0 byebutazi .
